Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2332
State Fire Marshal; powers.

The State Fire Marshal may, by rule and regulation, define occurrences relating to damage of an underground facility that creates an emergency condition that requires an excavator to immediately notify an operator or a locator, if applicable, and the center regarding the location and extent of damage to an underground facility.

Laws 2019, LB462, § 16.